Wisconsin, session 2025, SB336.
do enact as follows:SB336,11Section 1. 20.455 (2) (gr) of the statutes, as affected by 2023 Wisconsin Act 2240, section 1m., is amended to read:SB336,2,6320.455 (2) (gr) Handgun Firearm purchaser record check; checks for licenses or 4certifications to carry concealed weapons. All moneys received as fee payments 5under ss. 175.35 (2i) (a), 175.49 (5m), and 175.60 (7) (c) and (d), (13), and (15) (b) 4. 6a. and b. to provide services under ss. 175.35, 175.49, and 175.60.SB336,27Section 2. 175.33 of the statutes is created to read:SB336,2,88175.33 Transfer of firearms. (1) In this section:SB336,2,109(a) “Family member” means a spouse, parent, grandparent, sibling, child, or 10grandchild. The relationship may be by blood, marriage, or adoption.SB336,2,1111(b) “Firearm” includes the frame or receiver of a firearm.SB336,2,1212(c) “Firearms dealer” has the meaning given in s. 175.35 (1) (ar).SB336,3,11(d) “Transfer” has the meaning given in s. 175.35 (1) (br).SB336,3,32(2) No person may transfer ownership of a firearm, or be transferred 3ownership of a firearm, unless one of the following applies:SB336,3,44(a) The transferor is a firearms dealer.SB336,3,65(b) The transferor makes the transfer to or through a firearms dealer and 6obtains a receipt under s. 175.35 (2j) (b).SB336,3,87(c) The transfer of ownership of the firearm is one of the transfers listed under 8s. 175.35 (2t).SB336,3,129(d) The transferor is transferring ownership of the firearm to a family 10member by gift, bequest, or inheritance, the transferee is not prohibited from 11possessing a firearm under s. 941.29 or federal law, and the transferee is at least 18 12years of age.SB336,3,1613(3) Any person who intentionally violates sub. (2) is guilty of a misdemeanor 14and shall be fined not less than $500 nor more than $10,000 and may be imprisoned 15for not more than 9 months. The person is also prohibited under s. 941.29 from 16possessing a firearm for a period of 2 years.SB336,317Section 3. 175.35 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB336,3,1818175.35 (title) Purchase Transfer of handguns firearms.SB336,419Section 4. 175.35 (1) (at) of the statutes is amended to read:SB336,4,1220175.35 (1) (at) “Firearms restrictions record search” means a search of 21department of justice records to determine whether a person seeking to purchase 22receive the transfer of a handgun firearm is prohibited from possessing a firearm 23under s. 941.29. “Firearms restrictions record search” includes a criminal history 1record search, a search to determine whether a person is prohibited from possessing 2a firearm under s. 51.20 (13) (cv) 1., 2007 stats., a search in the national instant 3criminal background check system to determine whether a person has been ordered 4not to possess a firearm under s. 51.20 (13) (cv) 1., 51.45 (13) (i) 1., 54.10 (3) (f) 1., or 555.12 (10) (a), a search to determine whether the person is subject to an injunction 6under s. 813.12 or 813.122, or a tribal injunction, as defined in s. 813.12 (1) (e), 7issued by a court established by any federally recognized Wisconsin Indian tribe or 8band, except the Menominee Indian tribe of Wisconsin, that includes notice to the 9respondent that he or she is subject to the requirements and penalties under s. 10941.29 and that has been filed with the circuit court under s. 813.128 (3g), and a 11search to determine whether the person is prohibited from possessing a firearm 12under s. 813.123 (5m) or 813.125 (4m).SB336,513Section 5. 175.35 (1) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB336,614Section 6. 175.35 (1) (br) of the statutes is created to read:SB336,4,1615175.35 (1) (br) “Transfer” includes to sell, assign, pledge, lease, loan, give 16away, or otherwise dispose of.SB336,717Section 7. 175.35 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is renumbered 175.35 (2) (am) 18and amended to read:SB336,4,2219175.35 (2) (am) When a firearms dealer sells transfers a handgun firearm, 20including the frame or receiver of a firearm, he or she may not transfer possession of 21that handgun firearm to any other person until all of the following have occurred: 22requirements under par. (cm) have been met.SB336,81Section 8. 175.35 (2) (a), (b), (c) and (d) of the statutes are renumbered 2175.35 (2) (cm) 1., 2., 3. and 4.SB336,93Section 9. 175.35 (2) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB336,5,64175.35 (2) (bm) When a person transfers a firearm, including the frame or 5receiver of a firearm, through a firearms dealer, the transfer of possession of that 6firearm may not be made until all of the requirements of par. (cm) have been met.SB336,107Section 10. 175.35 (2) (cm) (intro.) of the statutes is created to read:SB336,5,98175.35 (2) (cm) (intro.) All of the following must occur before a firearm may be 9transferred under par. (am) or (bm):SB336,1110Section 11. 175.35 (2g) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB336,5,1311175.35 (2g) (a) The department of justice shall promulgate rules prescribing 12procedures under sub. (2) (cm) 1. for a transferee to provide and a firearms dealer to 13inspect identification containing a photograph of the transferee.SB336,1214Section 12. 175.35 (2g) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB336,5,2115175.35 (2g) (b) 1. The department of justice shall promulgate rules 16prescribing a notification form for use under sub. (2) (cm) 2. and 3. requiring the 17transferee to provide his or her name, date of birth, gender, race and social security 18number and other identification necessary to permit an accurate firearms 19restrictions record search under par. (c) 3. and the required notification under par. 20(c) 4. The department of justice shall make the forms available at locations 21throughout the state.SB336,1322Section 13. 175.35 (2g) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB336,6,523175.35 (2g) (b) 2. The department of justice shall ensure that each notification 1form under subd. 1. requires the transferee to indicate that he or she is not 2purchasing receiving a transfer of the firearm with the purpose or intent to transfer 3the firearm to a person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm under state or 4federal law and that each notification form informs the transferee that making a 5false statement with regard to this purpose or intent is a Class H felony.SB336,146Section 14. 175.35 (2i) of the statutes is renumbered 175.35 (2i) (a) and 7amended to read:SB336,6,108175.35 (2i) (a) The department shall charge a firearms dealer a $10 fee for 9each firearms restrictions record search that the firearms dealer requests under 10sub. (2) (c) (cm) 3.SB336,6,1211(b) 1. The firearms dealer may collect the fee under par. (a) from the 12transferee.SB336,6,1513(c) The department may refuse to conduct firearms restrictions record 14searches for any firearms dealer who fails to pay any fee under this subsection par. 15(a) within 30 days after billing by the department.SB336,1516Section 15. 175.35 (2i) (b) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB336,6,1917175.35 (2i) (b) 2. If the transfer is made under sub. (2) (bm), the firearms 18dealer may collect from the transferor the fee under par. (a) and any additional 19amount to cover any costs he or she incurs in processing the transfer.SB336,1620Section 16. 175.35 (2j) of the statutes is renumbered 175.35 (2j) (a).SB336,1721Section 17. 175.35 (2j) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB336,7,222175.35 (2j) (b) If a person transfers a firearm through a firearms dealer under 23sub. (2) (bm), or transfers a firearm to a firearms dealer, the firearms dealer shall 1provide the person a written receipt documenting the dealer’s participation in the 2transfer.SB336,183Section 18. 175.35 (2k) (ar) 2. of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb336 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb336 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB336 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB336 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB336: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting